Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 5. Obstruction of Public Administration.
Sec. 11.56.825.
Unlawful possession or use of traffic preemption device.

A person commits the crime of unlawful possession or use of a traffic preemption device if the person possesses or uses a traffic preemption device and that person is not, at the time of the possession or use, operating an emergency vehicle.

This section does not apply to

an employee of the state or a municipality who, at the time of the possession or use of a traffic preemption device, is authorized to install, repair, or maintain traffic preemption devices and only uses a device in the process of installing, repairing, and maintaining the devices; or

a person operating a motor vehicle involved in highway maintenance or public transit that has been authorized by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities or by the municipal assembly or council, as appropriate, to possess or use a traffic preemption device.

In this section,

“emergency vehicle” means a police, fire, or emergency medical service vehicle that only uses a traffic preemption device when responding to a fire or other emergency or when transporting a patient to a hospital or clinic or for transfer to another emergency vehicle;

“traffic preemption device” means a system that uses infrared light or other technology on a motor vehicle to transmit a signal to a receiver connected to a traffic light or other traffic control device for the purpose of giving the vehicle transmitting the signal the right-of-way by changing the traffic light or control device.

Unlawful possession or use of a traffic preemption device is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 40 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.827.
Impersonating a public servant in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of impersonating a public servant in the first degree if the person violates AS

11.56.830

by pretending to be a peace officer and purports to exercise the authority of a peace officer in relation to another person.

Impersonating a public servant in the first degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 4, ch. 78, SLA 2008 provides that this section “applies to offenses committed on or after September 4, 2008.”

Sec. 11.56.830.
Impersonating a public servant in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of impersonating a public servant in the second degree if the person pretends to be a public servant and purports to exercise the authority of a public servant in relation to another person.

It is not a defense to a prosecution under this section that

the office the defendant pretended to hold did not in fact exist; or

the defendant was in fact a public servant different than the one the defendant pretended to be.

This section does not apply to a peace officer acting within the scope and authority of the officer’s employment.

Impersonating a public servant in the second degree is a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978; am §§ 2, 3 ch 78 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

Definition of “public servant,” “peace officer” — AS

11.81.900

Criminal impersonation — AS

11.46.570

Original Code Provision — AS 11.30.220.

TD: IV, 88-89.

For criminal impersonation, see
AS

11.46.570

.

For punishment of class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.835.
Failure to register as a sex offender or child kidnapper in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of failure to register as a sex offender or child kidnapper in the first degree if the person violates AS

11.56.840

and the person has been previously convicted of a crime under this section or AS

11.56.840

or a law or ordinance of this or another jurisdiction with elements similar to a crime under this section or AS 11.56.840; or

with intent to escape detection or identification and, by escaping detection or identification, to facilitate the person’s commission of a sex offense or child kidnapping.

In a prosecution under (a)(2) of this section, the fact that the defendant, for a period of at least one year, failed to register as a sex offender or child kidnapper, failed to file the annual or quarterly written verification, or changed the sex offender’s or child kidnapper’s address and did not file the required notice of change of address, is prima facie evidence that the defendant intended to escape detection or identification and, by escaping detection or identification, to facilitate the person’s commission of a sex offense or child kidnapping.

In this section, “child kidnapping” and “sex offense” have the meanings given in AS

12.63.100

.

Failure to register as a sex offender or child kidnapper in the first degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 106 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.840.
Failure to register as a sex offender or child kidnapper in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of failure to register as a sex offender or child kidnapper in the second degree if the person

is required to register under AS

12.63.010

;

knows that the person is required to register under AS

12.63.010

; and

fails to

register;

file written notice of

change of residence;

change of mailing address;

establishment of an electronic or messaging address or any change to an electronic or messaging address; or

establishment of an Internet communication identifier or any change to an Internet communication identifier;

file the annual or quarterly written verification; or

supply accurate and complete information required to be submitted under this paragraph.

In a prosecution for failure to register as a sex offender or child kidnapper in the second degree under (a) of this section, it is an affirmative defense that

unforeseeable circumstances, outside the control of the person, prevented the person from registering under (a)(3)(A) of this section or filing or supplying the written notices, verification, and other information required under (a)(3)(B) — (D) of this section; and

the person contacted the Department of Public Safety orally and in writing immediately upon being able to perform the requirements described in this section.

Failure to register as a sex offender or child kidnapper in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 41 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 106 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 2008; am § 3 ch 18 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 21(a),
ch. 18, SLA 2010, provides that the 2010 reenactment of this section applies to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2010.
Section 20,
ch. 18, SLA 2010, sets out the following legislative statement concerning the culpable mental state required to be proven under this section
—
“In
AS

11.56.840(a)

,
—. the only culpable mental state required to be proven by the prosecution is the ‘knowing’ requirement in paragraph (2) of that subsection.
No other culpable mental state needs to be proven for the other elements of that offense.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 18, SLA 2010 (Senate Bill 222), relating to the repeal and reenactment of this section, see 2010 Senate Journal 1237 — 1239.

Sec. 11.56.845.
Hindering the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee.

A person commits hindering the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee if the person intentionally (1) fails to give, or (2) directs, orders, threatens, restrains, coerces, forces, or prevents another person from giving, full cooperation to the legislative auditor or the legislative fiscal analyst in assembling or furnishing requested information to the committee or its staff, and the person did not reasonably believe that the action or failure to act was legally justified.

Hindering the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee is a violation, punishable by a fine of not more than $5,000.

History.

(§ 1 ch 67 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

11.56.870

; renumbered in 2005.

Cross references. —

For provisions related to Legislative Budget and Audit Committee, see AS 24.60.151 — 24.60.311.